North Carolina, session 2025, HB1131.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, the sum of two million one hundred
seventy-eight thousand dollars ($2,178,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal
year to be used to increase the number of full-time Adult Protective Services (APS) workers
*H1131-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
statewide by at least 25 for the 2026-2027 fiscal year. Funds authorized by this section for the
allocation of 25 additional APS workers shall be distributed to county departments of social
services based on the greatest need for additional APS workers, as determined by the Division of
Social Services. In determining the counties with the greatest need for additional APS workers,
the Division of Social Services, in consultation with the North Carolina Association of County
Directors of Social Services, shall consider the following factors: (i) the total number of APS
cases within the county; (ii) the number of APS workers required to adequately assess and
evaluate the APS cases in the county; (iii) the population of individuals 65 years of age or older
residing in the county; and (iv) the volume of reports related to abuse, neglect, and exploitation
of older adults within each county.
SECTION 1.(b) County departments of social services that are the recipients of these
allocated funds shall not use these funds (i) for any purpose other than to pay for salaries, benefits,
and related expenses associated with the additional APS workers or (ii) to supplant any other
source of funding for staff.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 House Bill 1131-First Edition